Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska4-106
Aliens; labor or educational organization; appointment or election to office; unlawful; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any alien to be elected to or hold any office in a labor or educational organization in the State of Nebraska. Any person, officer, or any member of any labor organization knowingly or willfully violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1963, c. 20, § 1, p. 103;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 34.